fr: Style d'hameçon: Aberdeen; Assist; Circle; En J; Jig; Octopus; Offset; Large ouverture; Worm; Autre
en: Fishing hook style: Aberdeen; Assist; Circle; J; Jig; Octopus; Offset; Wide gap; Worm; Other
el: Στυλ αγκιστριού ψαρέματος: Aberdeen; Assist; Κυκλικό (Circle); J; Jig; Octopus; Offset; Wide gap; Worm; Άλλο
fi: Kalastuskoukun tyyli: Aberdeen; Assist; Circle; J; Jigi; Octopus; Offset; Wide gap; Mato; Muu
ja: 釣り針スタイル: アバディーン; アシスト; サークル; J字; ジグ; オクトパス; オフセット; ワイドギャップ; ワーム; その他
hr-HR: Stil ribarske udice: Aberdeen; Assist; Kružna; J; Jig; Octopus; Offset; Široki luk; Worm; Ostalo
pt-BR: Estilo de anzol: Aberdeen; Assist; Circular; J; Jig; Octopus; Offset; Wide gap; Worm; Outros
zh-TW: 魚鉤樣式: 阿伯丁魚鉤; 輔助鉤; 圓鉤; J 型鉤; 汲頭鉤; 章魚鉤; 曲柄鉤; 寬腹鉤; 軟蟲鉤; 其他
sk-SK: Štýl rybárskeho háčika: Aberdeen; Asistenčný (Assist); Kruhový; Tvar J; Jigový; Chobotnička; Ofsetový; Široký oblúk; Na červy; Iné
ro-RO: Stilul cârligului de pescuit: Aberdeen; Assist; Circle; J; Jig; Octopus; Offset; Wide gap; Worm; Altele
ko: 낚시 후크 스타일: 애버딘; 어시스트; 서클; J형; 지그; 옥토퍼스; 오프셋; 와이드 갭; 웜; 기타
nl: Vishaakstijl: Aberdeen; Assist; Cirkel; J; Jig; Octopus; Offset; Wide gap; Worm; Overige
sl-SI: Stil ribiškega trnka: Aberdeen; Assist; Krožni; J; Jig; Octopus; Zamaknjeni; Široki lok; Za črve; Drugo
zh-CN: 鱼钩样式: 阿伯丁鱼钩; 辅助鱼钩; 圈钩; J 形钩; 铅头钩; 章鱼钩; 曲柄钩; 宽腹钩; 软虫钩; 其他
th: รูปแบบของเบ็ดตกปลา: Aberdeen; Assist; Circle; J; Jig; Octopus; Offset; Wide gap; Worm; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Estilo de anzol: Aberdeen; Assist; Circular; J; Jig; Octopus; Offset; Abertura larga; Minhoca; Outro
hu: Horgászhorog stílusa: Aberdeen; Assist; Circle (körhorog); J; Jig; Octopus; Offset; Széles öblű (Wide gap); Worm; Egyéb
de: Angelhakenstil: Aberdeen; Assist; Circle; J; Jig; Octopus; Offset; Wide Gap; Wurm; Sonstige
es: Estilo de anzuelo: Aberdeen; Asistencia; Circular; J; Jig; Octopus; Desplazado; Abertura ancha; Lombriz; Otro
vi: Kiểu dáng lưỡi câu: Aberdeen; Trợ lực; Vòng tròn; Chữ J; Jig; Bạch tuộc; Chệch; Khe rộng; Mồi giun; Khác
tr: Olta iğnesi stili: Aberdeen; Asist; Daire; J; Jig; Ahtapot; Ofset; Geniş ağızlı; Solucan; Diğer
it: Stile dell'amo da pesca: Aberdeen; Assist; Circle; J; Jig; Octopus; Offset; Wide gap; Worm; Altro
lt-LT: Žvejybos kabliuko stilius: Aberdeen; Pagalbinis; Apskritas; J; Galvakablis; Aštuonkojis; Ofsetinis; Plataus išlinkimo; Sliekų; Kita
pl: Styl haczyka do łowienia ryb: Aberdeen; Assist; Circle; Typu J; Jigowy; Octopus; Offsetowy; Wide gap; Worm; Inny
da: Fiskekrogsstil: Aberdeen; Assist; Circle; J; Jig; Octopus; Offset; Wide gap; Orm; Andet
bg-BG: Стил на куката за риболов: Абърдийн; Асист; Кръгла; J-образна; Джиг; Октопод; Офсет; Широка дъга; За червеи; Друго
nb: Fiskekrok-stil: Aberdeen; Assist; Sirkel; J; Jigg; Octopus; Offset; Vidgap; Mark; Annet
ru: Стиль рыболовного крючка: Абердин (Aberdeen); Ассист (Assist); Круглый (Circle); J-образный; Джиговый; Октопус (Octopus); Офсетный; Широкий поддев (Wide gap); Для червя (Worm); Другое
sv: Krokmodell: Aberdeen; Assist; Cirkelkrok; J; Jigg; Octopus; Offset; Wide gap; Mask; Övrigt
cs: Typ rybářského háčku: Aberdeen; Assist; Kruhový; J; Jigový; Octopus; Offsetový; Široký (wide gap); Na červy; Jiné